xinruyan/swahili1.foma
read lexc < swahili1.lexc
define Noun;
define Vowel [a|e|i|o|u];
define Consonant [m|n|t|p|t⁀ʃ|k|ŋ];
define Original [b|d|pʰ|tʰ|kʰ];
define ChangeTo [w|l|p|t|k];
define OtoCb w -> b || Consonant _ Vowel;
define OtoCd l -> d || Consonant _ Vowel;
define OtoCpʰ p -> pʰ ||   _ [a|e|i|o|u] Consonant;
define OtoCtʰ t -> tʰ ||   _ [a|e|i|o|u] Consonant;
define OtoCkʰ k -> kʰ ||   _ [a|e|i|o|u] Consonant;
define OtoC OtoCb .o. OtoCd .o. OtoCpʰ .o. OtoCtʰ .o. OtoCkʰ;
read regex Noun .o. OtoC;
